Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.225.290

Enrollment options information booklet (as amended by 2009 c 450).

(1) The superintendent of public instruction shall prepare and annually distribute an information booklet outlining parents' and guardians' enrollment options for their children.

(2) Before the 1991-92 school year, the booklet shall be distributed to all school districts by the office of the superintendent of public instruction. School districts shall have a copy of the information booklet available for public inspection at each school in the district, at the district office, and in public libraries.

(3) The booklet shall include:

(a) Information about enrollment options and program opportunities, including but not limited to programs in RCW 28A.225.220, 28A.185.040, 28A.225.200 through 28A.225.215, 28A.225.230 through 28A.225.250, ((28A.175.090,)) 28A.340.010 through 28A.340.070 (small high school cooperative projects), and 28A.335.160;

(b) Information about the running start ((- community college or vocational-technical institute)) choice program under RCW 28A.600.300 through ((28A.600.395)) 28A.600.400; and

(c) Information about the seventh and eighth grade choice program under RCW 28A.230.090.

[ 2009 c 450 s 5; 1990 1st ex.s. c 9 s 207.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2009 c 450: See note following RCW 28A.600.280.

PDFRCW 28A.225.290

Enrollment options information booklet—Posting on website (as amended by 2009 c 524).

(1) The superintendent of public instruction shall prepare and annually distribute an information booklet outlining parents' and guardians' enrollment options for their children.

(2) ((Before the 1991-92 school year,)) The booklet shall be distributed to all school districts by the office of the superintendent of public instruction and shall be posted on the website of the office of the superintendent of public instruction. School districts shall have a copy of the information booklet available for public inspection at each school in the district, at the district office, and in public libraries.

(3) The booklet shall include:

(a) Information about enrollment options and program opportunities, including but not limited to programs in RCW 28A.225.220, 28A.185.040, 28A.225.200 through 28A.225.215, 28A.225.230 through 28A.225.250, ((28A.175.090,)) 28A.340.010 through 28A.340.070 (small high school cooperative projects), and 28A.335.160;

(b) Information about the running start(( - community college or vocational-technical institute choice)) program under RCW 28A.600.300 through ((28A.600.395)) 28A.600.400; ((and))

(c) Information about the seventh and eighth grade choice program under RCW 28A.230.090; and

(d) Information about the college high school diploma options under RCW 28B.50.535.

[ 2009 c 524 s 3; 1990 1st ex.s. c 9 s 207.]

NOTES:

Intent—2009 c 524: See note following RCW 28B.50.535.

PDFRCW 28A.225.290

Enrollment options information (as amended by 2009 c 556).

(1) The superintendent of public instruction shall prepare and annually ((distribute an)) provide access to information ((booklet)) outlining parents' and guardians' enrollment options for their children. Providing online access to the information satisfies the requirements of this section unless a parent or guardian specifically requests information to be provided in written form.

(2) ((Before the 1991-92 school year, the booklet shall be distributed to all school districts by the office of the superintendent of public instruction. School districts shall have a copy of the information booklet available for public inspection at each school in the district, at the district office, and in public libraries)) School districts shall provide access to the information in this section to the public. Providing online access to the information satisfies the requirements of this subsection unless a parent or guardian specifically requests the information be provided in written form.

(3) The booklet shall include:

(a) Information about enrollment options and program opportunities, including but not limited to programs in RCW 28A.225.220, 28A.185.040, 28A.225.200 through 28A.225.215, 28A.225.230 through 28A.225.250, * 28A.175.090, 28A.340.010 through 28A.340.070 (small high school cooperative projects), and 28A.335.160;

(b) Information about **the running start - community college or vocational-technical institute choice program under RCW 28A.600.300 through ((28A.600.395)) 28A.600.390; and

(c) Information about the seventh and eighth grade choice program under RCW 28A.230.090.

[ 2009 c 556 s 6; 1990 1st ex.s. c 9 s 207.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: *(1) RCW 28A.175.090 expired December 31, 1994.

**(2) The program was named "the running start program" by 2009 c 450 s 7.

(3) RCW 28A.225.290 was amended three times during the 2009 legislative session, each without reference to the other. For rule of construction concerning sections amended more than once during the same legislative session, see RCW 1.12.025.

Captions, headings not law—1990 1st ex.s. c 9: See note following RCW 28A.225.225.

Finding—Severability—1990 1st ex.s. c 9: See notes following RCW 28A.225.220.